Illinois, session 104th, HB4169.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Township Code is amended by changing 5Section 60-20 as follows: 6    (60 ILCS 1/60-20)7    Sec. 60-20. Resignation of officer. 8    (a) The township board may, for sufficient cause shown to 9them, accept the resignation of any officer of their township. 10Whenever they accept a resignation, the township clerk shall 11make a minute of the acceptance upon the township records. A 12resignation of a multi-township assessor, however, shall be 13made to and may be accepted by the multi-township board, and 14the clerk of the multi-township board shall make the minute 15upon the records of the multi-township board and forward a 16copy of the resignation and minute to the county clerk, the 17Department of Revenue, each of the township boards in the 18multi-township jurisdiction, and the supervisor of assessments 19for entry upon their permanent records.20    (b) Resignations become effective only if they are made in 21writing, signed by the person holding the office, notarized, 22and accepted upon acceptance by the township or multi-township 23board, as the case may be.  HB4169- 2 -LRB104 15622 RTM 28789 b1(Source: P.A. 85-694; 88-62.)